District of Columbia statutes.
50-2209.11

Automated enforcement expansion plan.

Not later than April 1, 2013, the Mayor shall transmit to the Council a plan for expansion of automated traffic enforcement in the District. The plan shall include:

(1)

An explanation of the plan, its goals, and the strategies to achieve the goals, such as red light, speed, fixed, and mobile;

(2)

A recommended number of automated enforcement cameras, by category, that should be deployed in the District to achieve appropriate levels of enforcement and associated traffic safety results;

(3)

A timeline for deploying the recommended number of cameras, including the number of additional cameras needed, by category and by fiscal year; and

(4)

The amount of funding necessary, in addition to what has been authorized as of the date of the plan’s publication, by fiscal year, to attain the target number of cameras.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-307, § 103, 60 DCR 2753
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103 of the Addition of this section Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-50, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6339, 20 DCSTAT 1356).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-307: Section 401(a) of D.C. Law 19-307 provided that this section shall apply as of May 1, 2013.